src/third-party/hunspell-dictionaries/uk.aff
SFX B                      
SFX B                  
SFX B                      
SFX B                  
SFX B                      
SFX B                  
SFX B                      
SFX B                  
SFX B                      
SFX B                  
SFX B                      
SFX B         [  ]    
SFX B           [  ]      
SFX B         [  ]    
SFX B           [  ]      
SFX B                
SFX B                    
SFX B                
SFX B                    
SFX B                
SFX B                    
SFX B          [  ]    
SFX B            [  ]      
SFX B          [  ]    
SFX B            [  ]      
SFX B            [  ]    
SFX B              [  ]      
SFX B            [  ]    
SFX B              [  ]      
SFX B            [  ]    
SFX B              [  ]      
SFX B                
SFX B                    
SFX B                
SFX B                    
SFX B                  
SFX B                      
SFX B                  
SFX B                      
SFX B                  
SFX B                      
SFX B              
SFX B                  
SFX B              
SFX B                  
SFX B              
SFX B                  
SFX B              
SFX B                  
SFX B              
SFX B                  
SFX B               
SFX B                   
SFX B                
SFX B                    
SFX B                
SFX B                    
SFX B                
SFX B                    
SFX B                
SFX B                    
SFX B                
SFX B                    
SFX B                
SFX B                    
SFX B                
SFX B                    
SFX B                
SFX B                    
SFX B                
SFX B                    
SFX B                
SFX B                    
SFX B              
SFX B                  
SFX B              
SFX B                  
SFX B                
SFX B                    
SFX B                
SFX B                    
SFX B                
SFX B                    
SFX B          [     ]    
SFX B            [     ]      
SFX B          [     ]    
SFX B            [     ]      
SFX B                
SFX B                    
SFX B           [    ]    
SFX B             [    ]      
SFX B                 
SFX B                     
SFX B            [    ]    
SFX B              [    ]      
SFX B                 
SFX B                     
SFX B                 
SFX B                     
SFX B            [    ]    
SFX B              [    ]      
SFX B            [    ]    
SFX B              [    ]      
SFX B                 
SFX B                     
SFX B                 
SFX B                     
SFX B            [    ]    
SFX B              [    ]      
SFX B            [    ]    
SFX B              [    ]      
SFX B                 
SFX B                     
SFX B            [    ]    
SFX B              [    ]      
SFX B                
SFX B                    
SFX B                
SFX B                    
SFX B                
SFX B                    
SFX B         [  ]    
SFX B           [  ]      
SFX B               
SFX B                   
SFX B                
SFX B                    
SFX B                
SFX B                    
SFX B          [    ]    
SFX B            [    ]      
SFX B          [    ]    
SFX B            [    ]      
SFX B                 
SFX B                     
SFX B                 
SFX B                     
SFX B                  
SFX B                      
SFX B                  
SFX B                      
SFX B            [    ]    
SFX B              [    ]      
SFX B            [    ]    
SFX B              [    ]      
SFX B                 
SFX B                     
SFX B                 
SFX B                     
SFX B                  
SFX B                      
SFX B            [    ]    
SFX B              [    ]      
SFX B           [^  ]     
SFX B             [^  ]       
SFX B           [^  ]     
SFX B             [^  ]       
SFX B            [^  ]     
SFX B              [^  ]       
SFX B             [^  ]     
SFX B               [^  ]       
SFX B             [^  ]     
SFX B               [^  ]       
SFX B             [^  ]     
SFX B               [^  ]       
SFX B             [^  ]     
SFX B               [^  ]       
SFX B             [^  ]     
SFX B               [^  ]       
SFX B             [^  ]     
SFX B               [^  ]       
SFX B             
SFX B                 
SFX B           [^  ]     
SFX B             [^  ]       
SFX B           [^  ]     
SFX B             [^  ]       
SFX B             [^  ]     
SFX B               [^  ]       
SFX B             [^  ]     
SFX B               [^  ]       
SFX B             [^  ]     
SFX B               [^  ]       
SFX B          [  ]     
SFX B            [  ]       
SFX B          [  ]     
SFX B            [  ]       
SFX B           [  ]     
SFX B             [  ]       
SFX B            [  ]     
SFX B              [  ]       
SFX B            [  ]     
SFX B              [  ]       
SFX B            [  ]     
SFX B              [  ]       
SFX B            [  ]     
SFX B              [  ]       
SFX B            [  ]     
SFX B              [  ]       
SFX B            [  ]     
SFX B              [  ]       
SFX B        [  ]     
SFX B          [  ]       
SFX B        [  ]     
SFX B          [  ]       
SFX B          [  ]     
SFX B            [  ]       
SFX B          [  ]     
SFX B            [  ]       
SFX B          [  ]     
SFX B            [  ]       
SFX B        [  ]    
SFX B          [  ]      
SFX B        [  ]    
SFX B          [  ]      
SFX B         [  ]    
SFX B           [  ]      
SFX B          [  ]    
SFX B            [  ]      
SFX B          [  ]    
SFX B            [  ]      
SFX B          [  ]    
SFX B            [  ]      
SFX B          [  ]    
SFX B            [  ]      
SFX B          [  ]    
SFX B            [  ]      
SFX B          [  ]    
SFX B            [  ]      
SFX B        [  ]    
SFX B          [  ]      
SFX B        [  ]    
SFX B          [  ]      
SFX B          [  ]    
SFX B            [  ]      
SFX B          [  ]    
SFX B            [  ]      
SFX B          [  ]    
SFX B            [  ]      
SFX B          [  ]    
SFX B            [  ]      
SFX B                    
SFX B                        
SFX B                    
SFX B                        
SFX B                     
SFX B                         
SFX B                      
SFX B                          
SFX B                      
SFX B                          
SFX B                      
SFX B                          
SFX B                      
SFX B                          
SFX B                      
SFX B                          
SFX B                      
SFX B                          
SFX B                    
SFX B                        
SFX B                    
SFX B                        
SFX B                      
SFX B                          
SFX B                      
SFX B                          
SFX B                      
SFX B                          
SFX B                 
SFX B                     
SFX B                 
SFX B                     
SFX B                  
SFX B                      
SFX B                   
SFX B                       
SFX B                   
SFX B                       
SFX B                   
SFX B                       
SFX B                   
SFX B                       
SFX B                   
SFX B                       
SFX B                   
SFX B                       
SFX B                 
SFX B                     
SFX B                 
SFX B                     
SFX B                   
SFX B                       
SFX B                   
SFX B                       
SFX B                   
SFX B                       
SFX B           [   ]     
SFX B             [   ]       
SFX B           [   ]     
SFX B             [   ]       
SFX B            [   ]     
SFX B              [   ]       
SFX B             [   ]     
SFX B               [   ]       
SFX B             [   ]     
SFX B               [   ]       
SFX B             [   ]     
SFX B               [   ]       
SFX B             [   ]     
SFX B               [   ]       
SFX B             [   ]     
SFX B               [   ]       
SFX B             [   ]     
SFX B               [   ]       
SFX B           [   ]     
SFX B             [   ]       
SFX B           [   ]     
SFX B             [   ]       
SFX B             [   ]     
SFX B               [   ]       
SFX B             [   ]     
SFX B               [   ]       
SFX B             [   ]     
SFX B               [   ]       
SFX B '         '    
SFX B '           '      
SFX B '         '    
SFX B '           '      
SFX B '          '    
SFX B '            '      
SFX B '           '    
SFX B '             '      
SFX B '           '    
SFX B '             '      
SFX B '           '    
SFX B '             '      
SFX B '           '    
SFX B '             '      
SFX B '           '    
SFX B '             '      
SFX B '           '    
SFX B '             '      
SFX B '         '    
SFX B '           '      
SFX B '         '    
SFX B '           '      
SFX B '           '    
SFX B '             '      
SFX B '           '    
SFX B '             '      
SFX B '           '    
SFX B '             '      
SFX D Y 52
SFX D        [         ]    
SFX D          [         ]      
SFX D         [      ]    
SFX D           [      ]      
SFX D          [         ]    
SFX D            [         ]      
SFX D          [         ]    
SFX D            [         ]      
SFX D           [      ]    
SFX D             [      ]      
SFX D           [      ]    
SFX D             [      ]      
SFX D          [         ]    
SFX D            [         ]      
SFX D          [         ]    
SFX D            [         ]      
SFX D           [      ]    
SFX D             [      ]      
SFX D           [      ]    
SFX D             [      ]      
SFX D              
SFX D                  
SFX D                
SFX D                    
SFX D                
SFX D                    
SFX D                
SFX D                    
SFX D                
SFX D                    
SFX D              
SFX D                  
SFX D                
SFX D                    
SFX D                
SFX D                    
SFX D                
SFX D                    
SFX D                
SFX D                    
SFX D             
SFX D                 
SFX D             
SFX D                 
SFX D               
SFX D                   
SFX D               
SFX D                   
SFX D               
SFX D                   
SFX D               
SFX D                   
SFX F Y 40
SFX F             
SFX F                 
SFX F             
SFX F                 
SFX F               
SFX F                   
SFX F               
SFX F                   
SFX F               
SFX F                   
SFX F              
SFX F                  
SFX F              
SFX F                  
SFX F                
SFX F                    
SFX F                
SFX F                    
SFX F                
SFX F                    
SFX F              
SFX F                  
SFX F              
SFX F                  
SFX F                
SFX F                    
SFX F                
SFX F                    
SFX F                
SFX F                    
SFX F             
SFX F                 
SFX F             
SFX F                 
SFX F               
SFX F                   
SFX F               
SFX F                   
SFX F               
SFX F                   
